Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB621.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 4122. Benefit transfer device fraud.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits an offense if the person is an unauthorized alien and possesses, uses or attempts to use a benefit transfer device.(b) Separate offenses.--Each time a person possesses or uses a benefit transfer device in violation of subsection (a) constitutes a separate offense under this section.(c) Grading.--A person who violates subsection (a) commits a felony of the third degree.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this 123456789101112131415161718 subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Benefit transfer device." The Pennsylvania ACCESS card or electronic benefit transfer card."Unauthorized alien." An alien who is not eligible for any State or local benefits under 8 U.S.C. § 1621(a) (relating to aliens who are not qualified aliens or nonimmigrants ineligible for State and local public benefits).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0621PN0632 - 2 - 12345678